Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-906.05
Rule or regulation; judicial notice.

(1) Every court of this state may take judicial notice of any rule or regulation that is signed by the Governor and filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to section 84-906.

(2) The court may inform itself of such rules and regulations in such manner as it may deem proper, and the court may call upon counsel to aid it in obtaining such information.

Laws 1974, LB 604, § 5;

Laws 1986, LB 992, § 6;

Laws 1987, LB 253, § 7;

Laws 1999, LB 320, § 1.

This court will take judicial notice of general rules and regulations established and published by Nebraska state agencies under authority of law. Raben v. Dittenber, 230 Neb. 822, 434 N.W.2d 11 (1989).